Utah statutes.
57-8-30.   Application of insurance proceeds to reconstruction.
In case of fire or any other disaster, the insurance proceeds, if sufficient
to reconstruct the building, shall be applied to such reconstruction.
Reconstruction of the building, as used in this section and Section 57-8-31,
means restoring the building to substantially the same condition in which it
existed prior to the fire or other disaster, with each unit and the common
elements having the same vertical and horizontal boundaries as before.
